Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 13 Food Service Establishments

Administrative rules and regulations.

Food Service, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-14.

26-2-370.
[Effective until January 1, 2023. See note.] Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Food nutrition information” means the content of food including, but not limited to, the caloric, fat, carbohydrate, cholesterol, fiber, sugar, potassium, protein, vitamin, mineral, and sodium content.

“Food service establishment” means establishments for the preparation and serving of meals, lunches, short orders, sandwiches, frozen desserts, or other edible products either for carry out or service within the establishment. This term includes restaurants; coffee shops; cafeterias; short order cafes; luncheonettes; taverns; lunchrooms; places which retail sandwiches or salads; soda fountains; institutions, both public and private; food carts; itinerant restaurants; industrial cafeterias; catering establishments; and similar facilities by whatever name called. Within a food service establishment, there may be a food sales component, not separately operated. This food sales component shall be considered as part of the food service establishment. This term shall not include:

A food sales establishment, as defined in Code Section 26-2-21, except as otherwise stated in this paragraph;

The food service component of any food sales establishment defined in Code Section 26-2-21;

Any outdoor recreation activity sponsored by the state, a county, a municipality, or any department or entity thereof, any outdoor or indoor (other than school cafeteria food service) public school function, or any outdoor private school function;

Any organization which is operating on its own property or on the property of a party that has provided written consent for the use of such property for such purpose and which is exempt from taxes under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 48-7-25 or under Section 501(d) or paragraphs (1) through (8) or paragraph (10) of Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code for the purpose of operating a house or other residential structures where seriously ill or injured children and their families are provided temporary accommodations in proximity to their treatment hospitals and where food is prepared, served, transported, or stored by volunteer personnel;

Establishments for the preparation and serving of meals, lunches, short orders, sandwiches, frozen desserts, or other edible products if such preparation or serving is an authorized part of and occurs upon the site of an event which:

Is sponsored by a political subdivision of this state;

Is held on the property of such sponsor or on the property of a party that has provided written consent for use of such property for such event; and

Lasts 120 hours or less; or

Nonprofit food sales and food service provided under a permit issued pursuant to Article 14 of this chapter.

“Person” or “persons” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, trustee, or association, or combination thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 371, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1001, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 660, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1174, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1220, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1558, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1216, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 361, § 1/HB 1303; Ga. L. 2011, p. 308, § 4/HB 457; Ga. L. 2013, p. 760, § 1/HB 101; Ga. L. 2014, p. 857, § 1/HB 778; Ga. L. 2020, p. 808, § 3/SB 345.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-370 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in paragraph (2), substituted “an event” for “a fair or festival” at the end of the introductory language, added present subparagraph (2)(B), and redesignated former subparagraphs (2)(B) and (2)(C) as present subparagraphs (2)(C) and (2)(D), respectively.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added the next-to-the last sentence in paragraph (2).

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, rewrote paragraph (2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “lunchrooms” was substituted for “lunch rooms” in the second sentence of paragraph (1) (now paragraph (2)).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a semicolon was substituted for a comma following “lunchrooms” in the second sentence of paragraph (1) (now paragraph (2)).

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 04.27.20.01, 05.12.20.02, 05.28.20.02, 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, 08.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, and 04.30.21.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 amendment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2013).

26-2-370.
[Effective January 1, 2023. See note.] Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Food nutrition information” means the content of food, including, but not limited to, the caloric, fat, carbohydrate, cholesterol, fiber, sugar, potassium, protein, vitamin, mineral, and sodium content.

“Food service establishment” means establishments for the preparation and serving of meals, lunches, short orders, sandwiches, frozen desserts, or other edible products either for carry out or service within the establishment. Such term includes restaurants; coffee shops; cafeterias; short order cafes; luncheonettes; taverns; lunchrooms; places which retail sandwiches or salads; soda fountains; institutions, both public and private; mobile food service establishments; industrial cafeterias; catering establishments; and similar facilities by whatever name called. Within a food service establishment, there may be a food sales component, not separately operated. This food sales component shall be considered as part of the food service establishment. Such term shall not include:

A food sales establishment, as defined in Code Section 26-2-21, except as otherwise stated in this paragraph;

The food service component of any food sales establishment defined in Code Section 26-2-21;

Any outdoor recreation activity sponsored by the state, a county, a municipality, or any department or entity thereof, any outdoor or indoor (other than school cafeteria food service) public school function, or any outdoor private school function;

Any organization which is operating on its own property or on the property of a party that has provided written consent for the use of such property for such purpose and which is exempt from taxes under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 48-7-25 or under Section 501(d) or paragraphs (1) through (8) or paragraph (10) of Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code for the purpose of operating a house or other residential structures where seriously ill or injured children and their families are provided temporary accommodations in proximity to their treatment hospitals and where food is prepared, served, transported, or stored by volunteer personnel;

Establishments for the preparation and serving of meals, lunches, short orders, sandwiches, frozen desserts, or other edible products if such preparation or serving is an authorized part of and occurs upon the site of an event which:

Is sponsored by a political subdivision of this state;

Is held on the property of such sponsor or on the property of a party that has provided written consent for use of such property for such event; and

Lasts 120 hours or less; or

Nonprofit food sales and food service provided under a permit issued pursuant to Article 14 of this chapter.

“Mobile food service establishment” means a mobile food service unit operating from a single base of operation and under the managerial authority of one permit holder.

“Person” or “persons” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, trustee, or association, or combination thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 371, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1001, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 660, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1174, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1220, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1558, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1216, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 361, § 1/HB 1303; Ga. L. 2011, p. 308, § 4/HB 457; Ga. L. 2013, p. 760, § 1/HB 101; Ga. L. 2014, p. 857, § 1/HB 778; Ga. L. 2020, p. 808, § 3/SB 345; Ga. L. 2022, p. 574, § 1/HB 1443.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-370 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective January 1, 2023, inserted a comma following “food” in paragraph (1); in paragraph (2), substituted “Such” for “This” at the beginning of the second and fifth sentences and substituted “mobile food service establishments” for “food carts; itinerant restaurants” in the second sentence; added paragraph (3); and redesignated former paragraph (3) as present paragraph (4).

26-2-371.
[Effective until January 1, 2023. See note.] Permits issued by county board of health or Department of Public Health; validity; transferability; rules and regulations by municipalities.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a food service establishment without having first obtained a valid food service establishment permit. Such permits shall be issued by the county board of health or its duly authorized representative, subject to supervision and direction by the Department of Public Health; but, where the county board of health is not functioning, such permit shall be issued by the Department of Public Health. Such permits shall be valid until suspended or revoked and shall not be transferable with respect to person or location. Nothing contained in this article shall prevent any municipality from adopting rules and regulations governing the licensing and operation of food service establishments.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 371, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-371 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

26-2-371.
[Effective January 1, 2023. See note.] Permits issued by county board of health or Department of Public Health; validity; transferability; rules and regulations by municipalities.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a food service establishment without having first obtained a valid food service establishment permit. Such permits shall be issued by the county board of health or its duly authorized representative, subject to supervision and direction by the Department of Public Health; but, where the county board of health is not functioning, such permit shall be issued by the Department of Public Health. Except as provided for in Code Section 26-2-379, such permits shall be valid until suspended or revoked and shall not be transferable with respect to person or location. When a mobile food service establishment has been permitted in any county, that permit shall be recognized by all counties pursuant to Code Section 26-2-379. Except as provided for in Code Section 26-2-379, nothing contained in this article shall prevent any municipality from adopting rules and regulations governing the licensing and operation of food service establishments.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 371, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2022, p. 574, § 2/HB 1443.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-371 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective January 1, 2023, substituted “Except as provided for in Code Section 26-2-379, such” for “Such” at the beginning of the third sentence; added the fourth sentence; and substituted “Except as provided for in Code Section 26-2-379, nothing” for “Nothing” at the beginning of the last sentence.

26-2-372.
Permits — Issuance; suspension, revocation, or denial; notice and hearing.

The Department of Public Health, or county boards of health acting as agents of the department, shall have the power and authority to issue permits to operate food service establishments and to suspend or revoke such permits in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated as provided for in this article. When, in the judgment of the department or the county board of health, acting as agent of the former, it is necessary and proper that such application for a permit be denied or that the permit previously granted be suspended or revoked, the applicant or holder thereof shall be afforded notice and hearing as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 31. In the event that such application is finally denied, suspended, or revoked, the applicant or holder of the permit shall be notified in writing. Such written notice shall specifically state any and all reasons why the application has been denied or the permit has been suspended or revoked.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 371, § 3; Code 1933, § 88-1003, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

26-2-373.
Promulgation of rules, regulations, and standards by Department of Public Health and county boards of health; exemption for nonprofit schools and institutions producing own milk.

For the purpose of protecting the public health, the Department of Public Health shall have the power to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as it deems necessary and proper to carry out the purpose and intent of this article, including the establishment of reasonable standards of sanitation for food service establishments and such establishments which are also retail frozen dessert packagers and the examination and condemnation of unwholesome food therein. County boards of health are authorized to adopt and promulgate supplementary rules and regulations, including the establishment of reasonable standards of sanitation for food service establishments, consistent with those adopted and promulgated by the department; provided, however, that no county board of health or political subdivision of this state shall enact any ordinance or issue any rules and regulations pertaining to the provision of food nutrition information at food service establishments. As used in this subsection, the term “political subdivision” means any municipality, county, local government authority, board, or commission; however, such term shall not include any state agency or state authority. The department and the county boards of health may obtain technical and laboratory assistance from the Department of Agriculture.

Nonprofit schools and institutions serving family-style meals shall not be included under the present law or any future law or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to such laws regulating the dispensing of milk in the kitchens and dining halls of such schools and institutions, provided such school or institution produces the milk on the school’s or institution’s farm which passes Department of Public Health and local health department sanitary requirements.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 371, § 4; Code 1933, § 88-1004, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1279, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 361, § 2/HB 1303; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Inspection by Commissioner of Agriculture of meat and meat products located within or held for sale or consumption in food service establishments, §

26-2-106

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Food Service, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-14.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

26-2-373.1.
Use of hair nets or hats by food preparers; penalty.

A person who, in the ordinary course of business in a food service establishment, prepares food which is to be consumed by humans shall wear, when preparing food, appropriate hair nets or hats or restraints to prevent contamination of such food.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 26-2-377, any person who violates subsection (a) of this Code section shall be subject to a civil penalty as follows:

For a first offense, neither fine nor punishment, but only a warning; and

For a second or subsequent offense, a civil penalty not to exceed $50.00.

The county board of health or its representative which issues food service establishment permits under this article shall be authorized to impose the penalties authorized under subsection (b) of this Code section and shall provide the permit holder with notice of any violation of subsection (a) of this Code section.

Hair nets shall not be required of food preparers when the preparer is a volunteer without payment for his or her services and the food is being prepared for a religious, educational, charitable, or nonprofit corporation.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-373.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 836, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 26.

26-2-374.
Contents and posting of notices relating to assistance to persons choking; relief from civil liability of persons rendering emergency aid.

The Department of Public Health shall print and distribute notices to every food service establishment in this state explaining the proper procedures to be taken to assist or aid persons who are choking. The notices shall contain such information as is found appropriate or necessary by the department and shall be posted and maintained by the food service establishment in a conspicuous place or places on the premises as required by the department.

Any person who renders emergency aid in good faith to persons who are choking, without any charge for his services, shall not be liable for any civil damages for any act or omission in rendering such emergency aid or as a result of any act or failure to act to provide or arrange for further treatment or care for such persons.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1004.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1272, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Good Samaritan Laws — Legal Disarray: An Update,” see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 1439 (1987).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

Cross references.

Relief from civil liability of persons rendering emergency care generally, § 51-1-29.

26-2-375.
Enforcement of article; inspection of food service and food sales establishments.

The Department of Public Health and the county boards of health, acting as duly authorized agents of the department, are authorized to enforce this article and rules, regulations, and standards adopted and promulgated under this article in establishments that have the majority of square footage of building floor space, including indoor and outdoor dining areas, used for the operation of food service as defined in Code Section 26-2-370. Their duly authorized representatives are authorized to enter upon and inspect the premises of any food service establishment as provided in Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 31.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, food sales establishments as defined in Code Section 26-2-21 shall be inspected and regulated under Article 2 of this chapter and shall not be subject to inspection or enforcement under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 371, § 7; Code 1933, § 88-1006, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 660, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1558, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

26-2-376.
Review of final order or determination by Department of Public Health; appeal to superior court.

Any person aggrieved by any final order or determination of any county board of health denying, suspending, or revoking any permit authorized in this article may secure review thereof by the Department of Public Health by appeal in the manner prescribed in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 31. Any person aggrieved by any final order or determination made by the Department of Public Health, whether originally or on appeal, may secure review thereof by appeal to the superior court in the manner prescribed in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 31.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 371, § 8; Code 1933, § 88-1007, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

26-2-377.
Penalty for violation of article.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated under this article by the Department of Public Health or by any county board of health shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 371, § 11; Code 1933, § 88-1008, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

26-2-378.
Meat products that contain extenders to be displayed on menus or placards; applicability to minor amounts of extenders.

All food service establishments in this state which serve meat products that contain extenders, such as textured vegetable protein, textured soy flour, fortified textured vegetable protein, or other such products, shall display on their menus, or by placards visible to the public, information stating that the meat product contains extenders. Products which contain extenders shall not be advertised using names which designate all meat products. The menu or other advertisement must bear the same name that appears on the package when received from the processor and the ingredients statement as listed on the label.

This Code section shall not be applicable to the serving of meat products which do not contain such an amount of extenders as to require additional labeling in accordance with other laws of the United States and laws of this state relating to meat products.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1009, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 1116, § 1.

26-2-379.
[Effective January 1, 2023] Recognition of out of county mobile food services; unannounced inspections; fees; notifications; expedited permitting; regulation.

A county board of health outside a mobile food service establishment’s county of origin shall recognize the permit from the mobile food service establishment’s county of origin as provided for in this Code section. Such recognition shall authorize the mobile food service establishment to operate in an outside county subject to the ordinances of such county or city.

A county board of health shall use the following process to recognize a permit from a mobile food service establishment’s county of origin:

Prior to operating in a county outside the mobile food service establishment’s county of origin, a mobile food service establishment shall submit to the county board of health in the outside county a copy of its mobile food service establishment permit from its county of origin, its permit for its base of operations, a listing of any other counties where it is authorized to operate, a listing of locations in the county where the mobile food service establishment intends to operate, a listing of the dates and times of intended operation, and any other documentation required by the county board of health. The listing of any other counties where the mobile food service establishment intends to operate shall be updated by the mobile food service establishment when it operates in additional counties. Such information shall be submitted in a manner determined by the county board of health, but an electronic delivery format shall be available; and

Upon receipt of all required information, the county board of health in the outside county shall verify on the Department of Public Health’s permit inspection data base that the permit is in good standing in the county of origin and in any other counties where the mobile food service establishment has been authorized to operate. All county boards of health shall utilize the department’s permit inspection data base. The county board of health for such outside county may charge an administrative fee, limited to the costs incurred, to confirm the mobile food service establishment’s standing in other counties where it is authorized to operate. Upon verification that the permit is in good standing and there are not public health or safety concerns, a county shall recognize the permit and shall authorize the mobile food service establishment to operate in its jurisdiction and have jurisdiction over the mobile food service establishment.

An outside county may refuse to recognize a mobile food service establishment’s permit if the base of operation or mobile unit permit is not from another county in this state, if the base of operation or mobile unit permit is not in good standing in the county of origin or any county within which it is authorized to operate, or for public health and safety concerns. If the county refuses to recognize a mobile food service establishment’s permit, the county shall provide the mobile food service establishment written notice regarding the basis for its refusal.

The mobile food service establishment may be subject to periodic and unannounced inspections in any outside county where its permit has been recognized. County boards of health shall utilize discretion when inspecting mobile food service establishments that have been authorized to operate in multiple jurisdictions to ensure they are not inspected more frequently than necessary to protect public health and safety. A mobile food service establishment shall allow the county board of health access for inspection when the mobile food service establishment is physically operating in such county.

Fees for inspections conducted in outside counties shall be paid in full by the next business day. Failure to pay for inspections in outside counties will result in termination of authorization to operate in that county. The inspection fee shall be limited to the administrative costs incurred by the county to complete the inspection.

If any such inspection results in a violation, any outside county shall notify the county of origin and any other counties where the mobile food service establishment is authorized to operate of the violation. Any county where the mobile food service establishment operates may issue a court citation, terminate authorization for the mobile food service establishment to operate in the county, or require implementation of a remediation plan for the violation.

A mobile food service establishment shall stay current with its annual inspection fees in its county of origin and shall provide any outside counties where it is authorized to operate proof of currency before operating in that county.

Mobile food service establishment operators shall be required to return to their base of operation at least daily or more often if needed to service their unit with fresh water and to empty their wastewater tank.

If at any time a mobile food service establishment’s permit is no longer in good standing in any jurisdiction, a county may revoke the establishment’s authorization to operate in its jurisdiction.

The Department of Public Health may establish an expedited permit approval and recognition process for mobile food service establishments for counties to utilize that is consistent with the provisions of this Code section.

The Department of Public Health may develop rules and regulations governing the operation of mobile food service establishments. Any such rules and regulations shall be tailored to address health and safety risks.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-379

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 574, § 3/HB 1443.

Effective date.

This Code section becomes effective January 1, 2023.